Washington statutes.
RCW 9.45.126

Measurement of commodities—Inducing violations—Penalty.

Every person who shall give, offer or promise, or conspire to give, offer or promise, directly or indirectly, any compensation, gratuity or reward to any person, corporation, independent contractor, or agent, employee or servant thereof with intent to violate RCW 9.45.124, is guilty of a class B felony, punishable by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than ten years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars, or both.

[ 2003 c 53 s 31; 1992 c 7 s 12; 1967 c 200 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.